uz_UZ.aff
SFX X 0 masliklarimdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimiznimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimiznidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimiznidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarimizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringnimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringnidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringnidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringnimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringiznimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringiznidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringiznidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaringizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarini [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarinimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarinidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarini-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarinidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarinimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarini-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklariga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarigami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarigadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklariga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarigadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarigamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklariga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarida [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarida-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklaridamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 masliklarida-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimnimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimnidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimnidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimnimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimiznimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimiznidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimiznidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarimizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringnimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringnidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringnidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringnimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringiznimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringiznidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringiznidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaringizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarinimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarinidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarini-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarinidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarinimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarini-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarigami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarigadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlariga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarigadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarigamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlariga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarida-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlaridamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 shlarida-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimnimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimnidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimnidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimnimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ishimgadir [^aeiou]
