uz_UZ.dic
achchiqlantir/X
adaptatsiyala/X
agʻanat/X
ajilla/X
akillash/X
alagʻdalan/X
alaxsi/X
aljirat/X
alohidala/X
ang-angla/X
aniqlash/X
arabchalash/X
arch/X
arralan/X
arzonlashtir/X
asoslan/X
atalan/X
avjlan/X
axtalantir/X
ayhayla/X
aynattir/X
ayriltir/X
azoblantir/X
badburushlan/X
bagʻishlash/X
bajarol/X
bankrotlash/X
barglat/X
basitlan/X
baybayla/X
behushlantiril/X
bekuchlan/X
bemazalashtir/X
berkin/X
betaraflash/X
betonla/X
bezattir/X
bez/X
bigʻirla/X
bildirish/X
bilqilla/X
biq/X
bitirtir/X
bloklan/X
boʻgʻdiril/X
boʻjraytir/X
boʻldirgiz/X
boʻrlan/X
boʻshantir/X
boʻtqala/X
boʻysundir/X
bolsheviklashtir/X
boqqiz/X
boshlash/X
boshsizlantir/X
botirlash/X
briketla/X
bukchaytir/X
bula/X
burash/X
burish/X
buruqsat/X
butunlan/X
buzdir/X
chakanala/X
chalish/X
chamala/X
changla/X
chapla/X
chaqir/X
charcha/X
chatnash/X
chaynalaver/X
chechaklan/X
chekichla/X
chert/X
chigallash/X
chil/X
chingʻilla/X
chiqaver/X
chirilla/X
chirpira/X
chiychiylash/X
chizdir/X
choʻchchaytiril/X
choʻkish/X
choʻltoqlash/X
choʻqila/X
choʻtla/X
chopil/X
chorla/X
chugʻurlash/X
chuqurlan/X
chuval/X
chuvrat/X
dakangla/X
damla/X
dardlantir/X
dastalash/X
davrla/X
degizdir/X
depsat/X
didla/X
dildira/X
dirdira/X
diydira/X
doʻmbilla/X
doʻppaytir/X
doʻstlashish/X
dori/X
duduqlan/X
dumbullan/X
duvurlat/X
egilish/X
ekranla/X
elektrlashtiril/X
emgakla/X
enkaytir/X
erintir/X
ersira/X
eslash/X
ezdir/X
eʼzozlash/X
faranglash/X
fokusla/X
gajakla/X
ganchla/X
gapirtiril/X
gavdalan/X
gezart/X
gʻamlattir/X
gʻayratlantir/X
gʻimirsiralash/X
gʻiytillash/X
gʻujlat/X
gildirat/X
gudronlan/X
gurkurat/X
hadiksirat/X
harakatlanish/X
haydash/X
hidsizlan/X
hoʻlla/X
huhlat/X
iblislash/X
ihran/X
ilgarilat/X
ili/X
imirsila/X
ingichkalashtir/X
integratsiyala/X
irgʻitil/X
ishonaver/X
iskalan/X
itqit/X
iyman/X
jadallashtiril/X
jaranglat/X
jigʻilla/X
jil/X
jiri/X
joʻna/X
juftlashtir/X
kalovlan/X
karchla/X
kavsharlat/X
keksar/X
kergila/X
ketmonlat/X
kiril/X
kiydir/X
koʻch/X
koʻndirtir/X
koʻrgaz/X
koʻzlan/X
konveyerlashtir/X
krekinglashtir/X
kulchalan/X
kutkilan/X
kvotalan/X
liberallashtir/X
loʻqillash/X
loyqa/X
majolsizlan/X
mashinalashtiril/X
mazalan/X
mexanikalashtiril/X
milliylash/X
miriqish/X
moʻllash/X
moslan/X
mugʻombirlash/X
munglash/X
mustahkamlan/X
namakobla/X
nayla/X
niqtala/X
nolish/X
novqoslan/X
obmotkala/X
och/X
ohaklat/X
oʻgirtir/X
oʻltir/X
oʻpkalan/X
oʻrash/X
oʻrnashtiril/X
oʻtil/X
oʻtoqla/X
oʻyla/X
oʻzgar/X
olislash/X
ontarish/X
oq/X
orzula/X
osonlashtiril/X
ovuttir/X
pachaqlan/X
parchinla/X
pastlash/X
peshkashla/X
piqirlash/X
pishtla/X
plugla/X
porala/X
proyeksiyala/X
qadaltir/X
qalaylattir/X
qanoatlantiril/X
qaratish/X
qashlattir/X
qatʼiylash/X
qayrat/X
qichittir/X
qimmatlash/X
qirtillat/X
qitirlat/X
qiyqanglash/X
qiziqtir/X
qoʻndirish/X
qoʻrqit/X
qolin/X
qoplan/X
qorongʻilashtiril/X
quchoqlat/X
qumalat/X
qursha/X
quturtir/X
quyilash/X
ranjish/X
razillashtiril/X
rohatlantir/X
sahifala/X
sanchit/X
saranjomlan/X
sava/X
selkillat/X
serkillat/X
shabadala/X
shalpay/X
sharaqlat/X
shayla/X
shilin/X
shingʻirla/X
shish/X
shoʻrla/X
shoxlat/X
sidir/X
silki/X
singi/X
siralan/X
sitqiz/X
sizgʻirtir/X
sogʻintir/X
soʻndiril/X
soʻzlash/X
sovittir/X
sudlan/X
sunʼiylashtir/X
surishtiraver/X
sustlash/X
suykanish/X
tabriklan/X
takomillash/X
tambalan/X
tani/X
taqilla/X
taraqlash/X
tarqattir/X
tashkillan/X
tatit/X
tayyorlanil/X
tebratish/X
telefonlashtiril/X
teptir/X
tetiklan/X
tikilish/X
tilin/X
tindiril/X
tiqilishtir/X
tirishib-tirmash/X
tirtish/X
tivitlan/X
tobla/X
toʻlattir/X
toʻna/X
toʻqilla/X
toʻstiril/X
toʻzi/X
topaver/X
tortil/X
toygʻantir/X
tugat/X
tunash/X
turla/X
tush/X
tut/X
uchiraver/X
ufla/X
ulugʻlash/X
unna/X
urish/X
uvillash/X
uygʻunlashtiril/X
uzayt/X
vahshiylan/X
varanglat/X
vijilla/X
voshilla/X
xarobalan/X
xayrlash/X
xirpala/X
xoʻrozlan/X
xotirjamlan/X
xushvaqtlan/X
yalin/X
yamlan/X
yarashtir/X
yashat/X
yayovla/X
yelimlan/X
yeng/X
ye/X
yiqil/X
yogʻdirtir/X
yoʻnal/X
yoʻy/X
yondashil/X
yoqlash/X
yoshlantir/X
yoydirt/X
yugʻur/X
yumdalan/X
yuqtiril/X
yuvil/X
zamonaviylashtiril/X
zaxirala/X
zirillat/X
zoriq/X
